en: Keep locked up, S1
cs: Uchovávejte uzamčené, S1
de: Unter Verschluss aufbewahren, S1
dk: Opbevares under lås, S1
el: Να φυλάσσεται κλειδωµένο, S1
es: Consérvese bajo llave, S1
et: Hoida lukustatult, S1
fi: Säilytettävä lukitussa tilassa, S1
fr: Conserver sous clé, S1
hu: Elzárva tartandó, S1
it: Conservare sotto chiave, S1
lt: Laikyti užrakintą, S1
lv: Turēt noslēgtu, S1
mt: Żomm maqful, S1
nl: Achter slot bewaren, S1
no: Oppbevares innelåst, S1
pl: Przechowywać pod zamknięciem, S1
pt: Guardar fechado à chave, S1
sk: Uchovávajte uzamknuté, S1
sl: Hraniti zaklenjeno, S1
sv: Förvaras i låst utrymme, S1

en: Keep locked up and out of reach of children, S1/2
cs: Uchovávejte uzamčené a mimo dosah dětí, S1/2
de: Unter Verschluss und für Kinder unzugänglich aufbewahren, S1/2
dk: Opbevares under lås og utilgængeligt for børn, S1/2
el: Φυλάξτε το κλειδωµένο και µακριά από παιδιά, S1/2
es: Consérvese bajo llave y manténgase fuera del alcance de los niños, S1/2
et: Hoida lukustatult ja lastele kättesaamatus kohas, S1/2
fi: Säilytettävä lukitussa tilassa ja lasten ulottumattomissa, S1/2
fr: Conserver sous clef et hors de portée des enfants, S1/2
hu: Elzárva és gyermekek számára hozzáférhetetlen helyen tartandó, S1/2
it: Conservare sotto chiave e fuori della portata dei bambini, S1/2
lt: Laikyti užrakintą vaikams neprieinamoje vietoje, S1/2
lv: Turēt noslēgtu un sargāt no bērniem, S1/2
mt: Żomm maqful u fejn ma jilħqux it-tfal, S1/2
nl: Achter slot en buiten bereik van kinderen bewaren, S1/2
no: Oppbevares innelåst og utilgjengelig for barn, S1/2
pl: Przechowywać pod zamknięciem i chronić przed dziećmi, S1/2
pt: Guardar fechado à chave e fora do alcance das crianças, S1/2
sk: Uchovávajte uzamknutý a mimo dosahu detí, S1/2
sl: Hraniti zaklenjeno in izven dosega otrok, S1/2
sv: Förvaras i låst utrymme och oåtkomligt för barn, S1/2

en: Do not keep the container sealed, S12
cs: Neuchovávejte obal těsně uzavřený , S12
de: Behälter nicht gasdicht verschließen, S12
dk: Emballagen må ikke lukkes tæt, S12
el: Μη διατηρείτε το δοχείο ερµητικά κλεισµένο, S12
es: No cerrar el recipiente herméticamente, S12
et: Mitte hoida hermeetiliselt suletud pakendis, S12
fi: Pakkausta ei saa sulkea ilmatiiviisti, S12
fr: Ne pas fermer hermétiquement le récipient, S12
hu: Az edényzetet nem szabad légmentesen lezárni, S12
it: Non chiudere ermeticamente il recipiente, S12
lt: Nelaikyti sandariai uždarytos pakuotės, S12
lv: Neuzglabāt slēgtā veidā, S12
mt: Tħallix il-kontenitur magħluq, S12
nl: De verpakking niet hermetisch sluiten, S12
no: Emballasjen må ikke lukkes tett igjen, S12
pl: Nie przechowywać pojemnika szczelnie zamkniętego, S12
pt: Não fechar o recipiente hermeticamente, S12
sk: Neuchovávajte nádobu hermeticky uzatvorenú, S12
sl: Posoda ne sme biti tesno zaprta, S12
sv: Förpackningen får inte tillslutas lufttätt, S12

en: Keep away from food\, drink and animal feedingstuffs, S13
cs: Uchovávejte odděleně od potravin\, nápojů a krmiv, S13
de: Von Nahrungsmitteln\, Getränken und Futtermitteln fernhalten, S13
dk: Må ikke opbevares sammen med fødevarer\, drikkevarer og foderstoffer, S13
el: Μακριά από τρόφιµα\, ποτά και ζωοτροφές, S13
es: Manténgase lejos de alimentos\, bebidas y piensos, S13
et: Hoida eemal toiduainest\, joogist ja loomasöödast, S13
fi: Ei saa säilyttää yhdessä elintarvikkeiden eikä eläinravinnon kanssa, S13
fr: Conserver à l'écart des aliments et boissons\, y compris ceux pour animaux, S13
hu: Élelmiszertől\, italtól és takarmánytól távol tartandó, S13
it: Conservare lontano da alimenti o mangimi e da bevande, S13
lt: Laikyti atokiau nuo maisto\, gėrimų ir gyvulių pašaro, S13
lv: Neuzglabāt kopā ar pārtiku vai dzīvnieku barību, S13
mt: Żomm 'il bogħod minn ikel\, xorb u minn għalf ta' l-annimali, S13
nl: Verwijderd houden van eet- en drinkwaren en van diervoeder, S13
no: Oppbevares adskilt fra næringsmidler\, nytelsesmidler og dyrefor, S13
pl: Nie przechowywać razem z żywnością\, napojami i paszami dla zwierząt, S13
pt: Manter afastado de alimentos e bebidas\, incluindo os dos animais, S13
sk: Uchovávajte mimo dosahu potravín\, nápojov a krmív pre zvieratá, S13
sl: Hraniti ločeno od hrane\, pijače in krmil, S13
sv: Förvaras åtskilt från livsmedel och djurfoder, S13

en: Keep away from… (incompatible materials to be indicated by the manufacturer), S14
cs: Uchovávejte odděleně od… (vzájemně se vylučující látky uvede vý robce), S14
de: Von… fernhalten (inkompatible Substanzen sind vom Hersteller anzu geben), S14
dk: Opbevares adskilt fra… (uforligelige stoffer\, som angives af fabrikanten), S14
el: Μακριά από… (ασύµβατες ουσίες καθορίζονται από τον παρα- γωγό), S14
es: Consérvese lejos de… (materiales incompatibles a especificar por el fabricante), S14
et: Hoida eraldi… (kokkusobimatud kemikaalid määrab valmistaja), S14
fi: Säilytettävä erillään… (yhteensopimattomat aineet ilmoittaa valmistaja/maahantuoja), S14
fr: Conserver à l'écart des… (matières incompatibles à indiquer par le fabricant), S14
hu: … -tól/-től távol tartandó (az összeférhetetlen anyago(ka)t a gyártó határozza meg), S14
it: Conservare lontano da… (sostanze incompatibili da precisare da parte del produttore), S14
lt: Laikyti atokiau nuo… ( nesuderinamas medžiagas nurodo gamintojas), S14
lv: Neuzglabāt kopā ar… (ražotājs norāda nesavietojamās vielas), S14
mt: Żomm 'il bogħod minn… (materjal inkompatibbli li jkun indikat mill-manifattur), S14
nl: Verwijderd houden van… (stoffen waarmee contact vermeden dient te wordenaan te geven door de fabrikant), S14
no: Oppbevares adskilt fra… (angis av produsent eller importør), S14
pl: Nie przechowywać razem z… (materiałami określonymi przez producenta), S14
pt: Manter afastado de… (matérias incompatíveis a indicar pelo produ tor), S14
sk: Uchovávajte mimo dosahu… (neznášanlivého materiálu\, ktorý určí výrobca), S14
sl: Hraniti ločeno od… (nezdružljive snovi določi proizvajalec), S14
sv: Förvaras åtskilt från… (oförenliga ämnena anges av tillverkaren), S14

en: Keep away from acids\, alkalies\, heavy metal salts and reducing substances, S14.1
de: Von starken Säuren\, Laugen\, Schwermetallsalzen und reduzierenden Stoffen fernhalten, S14.1
dk: Opbevares adskilt fra stærke syrer\, lud\, tungmetalsalte og reducerende stoffer, S14.1
es: Mantener alejado de ácidos fuertes\, lejías\, sales de metales pesados y sustancias de reducción, S14.1
fi: Eristettävä hapoista\, lipeistä\, raskasmetallisuoloista ja pelkistävistä aineista, S14.1
fr: Tenir à l'abri des acides\, des lessives\, des sels de métaux lourds et des matières réduites, S14.1
it: Tenere lontano da acidi forti\, soluzioni alcaline\, sali di metalli pesanti e sostanze riducenti, S14.1
nl: Uit de buurt houden van sterke zuren\, logen\, zouten van zware metalen en reducerende stoffen, S14.1
no: Holdes borte fra sterke syrer\, lut\, tungmetallsalt og reduserende stoffer, S14.1
pt: Manter afastado/-a de ácidos fortes\, lixívias\, sal de metal pesado e substâncias redutoras, S14.1
sv: Förvaras åtskilt från starka syror\, alkalier\, tunga metallsalter och reducerande ämnen, S14.1

en: From reducing substances (e.g. amines)\, acids\, alkalies and heavy metal compounds (e.g. activators\, drying agents\, metallic soaps), S14.2
de: Von reduzierenden Substanzen (z.B. Aminen)\, Säuren\, Alkalien und Schwermetallverbindungen (z.B. Beschleuniger\, Trocknungsmittel\, Metallseifen) fernhalten, S14.2
dk: Opbevares adskilt fra reducerende substanser (f.eks. aminer)\, syrer\, alkalier og tungmetalforbindelser (f.eks. acceleratorer\, tørringsmidler\, metalsæber), S14.2
es: Mantener alejado de substancias de reducción (p.ej. aminas)\, ácidos\, álcalis y combinaciones de metales pesados (p.ej. acelerantes\, agentes de secado\, saponificados metálicos), S14.2
fi: Eristettävä pelkistävistä aineista (esim. aminot)\, hapoista\, emäksistä ja raskasmetalliyhdistelmistä (esim. kiihdyttäjät\, kuivatusaineet\, metallisaippuat), S14.2
fr: Tenir à l'abri des substances réduites (par ex. les amines)\, des acides\, des alcalis et des composés de métaux lourds (par ex. activateurs\, déshydratants\, savon métallique), S14.2
it: Tenere lontano da sostanze riducenti (p. es. ammine)\, acidi\, alcali e composti di metalli pesanti (p. es. acceleratori\, essiccanti\, saponi organometallici), S14.2
nl: Van reducerende substanties (bijv. aminen)\, zuren\, alkaliën en verbindingen van zware metalen (bijv. versnellers\, droogmiddelen\, metaalzepen), S14.2
no: Fra reduserende substanser (f.eks. aminer\, syrer\, alkalier og tungmetallforbindelser (f.eks. akselerator\, tørkemiddel\, metallsåpe), S14.2
pt: Manter afastado/-a de substâncias redutoras (por exemplo aminas)\, ácidos\, álcalis e combinações de metal pesado (por exemplo activadores\, agentes de dessecação\, sabão metálico), S14.2
sv: Förvaras åtskilt från reducerande substanser (t ex aminer)\, syror\, alkalier och tunga metallföreningar (t ex acceleratorer\, torkmedel\, metalltvål), S14.2

en: Keep away from heat, S15
cs: Chraňte před teplem, S15
de: Vor Hitze schützen, S15
dk: Må ikke udsættes for varme, S15
el: Μακριά από θερµότητα, S15
es: Conservar alejado del calor, S15
et: Hoida eemal soojusallikast, S15
fi: Suojattava lämmöltä, S15
fr: Conserver à l'écart de la chaleur, S15
hu: Hőhatástól távol tartandó, S15
it: Conservare lontano dal calore, S15
lt: Laikyti atokiau nuo šilumos šaltinių, S15
lv: Sargāt no sasilšanas, S15
mt: Żomm 'il bogħod mis-sħana, S15
nl: Verwijderd houden van warmte, S15
no: Må ikke utsettes for varme, S15
pl: Przechowywać z dala od źródeł ciepła, S15
pt: Manter afastado do calor, S15
sk: Uchovávajte mimo dosahu tepla, S15
sl: Varovati pred toploto, S15
sv: Får inte utsättas för värme, S15

en: Keep away from sources of ignition - No smoking, S16
cs: Uchovávejte mimo dosah zdrojů zapálení - Zákaz kouření, S16
de: Von Zündquellen fernhalten - Nicht rauchen, S16
dk: Holdes væk fra antændelseskilder --- Rygning forbudt, S16
el: Μακριά από πηγές ανάφλεξης - Απαγορεύεται το κάπνισµα, S16
es: Conservar alejado de toda llama o fuente de chispas - No fumar, S16
et: Hoida eemal süttimisallikast - Mitte suitsetada!, S16
fi: Eristettävä sytytyslähteistä --- Tupakointi kielletty, S16
fr: Conserver à l'écart de toute flamme ou source d'étincelles - Ne pas fumer, S16
hu: Gyújtóforrástól távol tartandó - Tilos a dohányzás, S16
it: Conservare lontano da fiamme e scintille - Non fumare, S16
lt: Laikyti atokiau nuo uždegimo šaltinių. Nerūkyti, S16
lv: Sargāt no uguns – nesmēk¸ ēt, S16
mt: Żomm 'il bogħod minn fjammi u qbid tan-nar – Tpejjipx, S16
nl: Verwijderd houden van ontstekingsbronnen - Niet roken, S16
no: Holdes vekk fra antennelseskilder --- Røyking forbudt, S16
pl: Nie przechowywać w pobliżu źródeł zapłonu – nie palić tytoniu, S16
pt: Manter afastado de qualquer chama ou fonte de ignição - Não fumar, S16
sk: Uchovávajte mimo dosahu zdrojov zapálenia - Zákaz fajčenia, S16
sl: Hraniti ločeno od virov vžiga - ne kaditi, S16
sv: Förvaras åtskilt från antändningskällor - Rökning förbjuden, S16

en: Keep away from combustible material, S17
cs: Uchovávejte mimo dosah hořlavých materiálů, S17
de: Von brennbaren Stoffen fernhalten, S17
dk: Holdes væk fra brandbare stoffer, S17
el: Μακριά από καύσιµα υλικά, S17
es: Manténgase lejos de materias combustibles, S17
et: Hoida eemal süttivatest ainetest, S17
fi: Säilytettävä erillään syttyvistä kemikaaleista, S17
fr: Tenir à l'écart des matières combustibles, S17
hu: Éghető anyagoktól távol tartandó, S17
it: Tenere lontano da sostanze combustibili, S17
lt: Laikyti atokiau nuo galinčių degti medžiagų, S17
lv: Sargāt no degoša materiāla, S17
mt: Żomm 'il bogħod minn materjal li jieħu n-nar, S17
nl: Verwijderd houden van brandbare stoffen, S17
no: Oppbevares adskilt fra brennbare stoffer, S17
pl: Nie przechowywać razem z materiałami zapalnymi, S17
pt: Manter afastado de matérias combustíveis, S17
sk: Uchovávajte mimo dosahu horl’avého materiálu, S17
sl: Hraniti ločeno od gorljivih snovi, S17
sv: Förvaras åtskilt från brandfarliga ämnen, S17

en: Handle and open container with care, S18
cs: Zacházejte s obalem opatrně a opatrně jej otevírejte, S18
de: Behälter mit Vorsicht öffnen und handhaben, S18
dk: Emballagen skal behandles og åbnes med forsigtighed, S18
el: Χειριστείτε και ανοίξτε το δοχείο προσεκτικά, S18
es: Manipúlese y ábrase el recipiente con prudencia, S18
et: Käidelda ja avada pakend ettevaatlikult, S18
fi: Pakkauksen käsittelyssä ja avaamisessa on noudatettava varovaisuutta, S18
fr: Manipuler et ouvrir le récipient avec prudence, S18
hu: Az edényzetet óvatosan kell kezelni és kinyitni, S18
it: Manipolare ed aprire il recipiente con cautela, S18
lt: Pakuotę naudoti ir atidaryti atsargiai, S18
lv: Ievērot īpašu piesardzību\, darbojoties ar konteineru un atverot to, S18
mt: Attent kif tħarrek u tiftaħil-kontenitur, S18
nl: Verpakking voorzichtig behandelen en openen, S18
no: Behandles og åpnes med forsiktighet, S18
pl: Zachować ostrożność w trakcie otwierania i manipulacji z pojemnikiem, S18
pt: Manipular e abrir o recipiente com prudência, S18
sk: S nádobou zaobchádzajte a otvárajte opatrne, S18
sl: Previdno ravnati s posodo in jo previdno odpirati, S18
sv: Förpackningen hanteras och öppnas försiktigt, S18

en: Keep out of the reach of children, S2
cs: Uchovávejte mimo dosah dětí, S2
de: Darf nicht in die Hände von Kindern gelangen, S2
dk: Opbevares utilgængeligt for børn, S2
el: Μακριά από παιδιά, S2
es: Manténgase fuera del alcance de los niños, S2
et: Hoida lastele kättesaamatus kohas, S2
fi: Säilytettävä lasten ulottumattomissa, S2
fr: Conserver hors de la portée des enfants, S2
hu: Gyermekek kezébe nem kerülhet, S2
it: Conservare fuori della portata dei bambini, S2
lt: Saugoti nuo vaikų, S2
lv: Sargāt no bērniem, S2
mt: Żomm fejn ma jintlaħaqx mit-tfal, S2
nl: Buiten bereik van kinderen bewaren, S2
no: Oppbevares utilgjengelig for barn, S2
pl: Chronić przed dziećmi, S2
pt: Manter fora do alcance das crianças, S2
sk: Uchovávajte mimo dosahu detí, S2
sl: Hraniti izven dosega otrok, S2
sv: Förvaras oåtkomligt för barn, S2

en: When using do not eat or drink, S20
cs: Nejezte a nepijte při používání, S20
de: Bei der Arbeit nicht essen und trinken, S20
dk: Der må ikke spises eller drikkes under brugen, S20
el: Μη τρώτε ή πίνετε όταν το χρησιµοποιείτε, S20
es: No comer ni beber durante su utilización, S20
et: Käitlemisel söömine ja joomine keelatud, S20
fi: Syöminen ja juominen kielletty kemikaalia käsiteltäessä, S20
fr: Ne pas manger et ne pas boire pendant l'utilisation, S20
hu: Használat közben enni\, inni nem szabad, S20
it: Non mangiare nè bere durante l'impiego, S20
lt: Naudojant nevalgyti ir negerti, S20
lv: Nedzert un neēst\, darbojoties ar vielu, S20
mt: Tikolx u tixrobx waqt li qed tużah, S20
nl: Niet eten of drinken tijdens gebruik, S20
no: Det må ikke spises eller drikkes under arbeidet, S20
pl: Nie jeść i nie pić podczas stosowania produktu, S20
pt: Não comer nem beber durante a utilização, S20
sk: Pri používaní nejedzte ani nepite, S20
sl: Med uporabo ne jesti in ne piti, S20
sv: Ät inte eller drick inte under hanteringen, S20

en: When using do not eat\, drink or smoke, S20/21
cs: Nejezte\, nepijte a nekuřte při používání, S20/21
de: Bei der Arbeit nicht essen\, trinken oder rauchen, S20/21
dk: Der må ikke spises\, drikkes eller ryges under brugen, S20/21
el: Όταν το χρησιµοποιείτε µην τρώτε\, µην πίνετε\, µην καπνίζετε, S20/21
es: No comer\, ni beber\, ni fumar durante su utilización, S20/21
et: Käitlemise ajal söömine\, joomine ja suitsetamine keelatud, S20/21
fi: Syöminen\, juominen ja tupakointi kielletty kemikaalia käytettäessä, S20/21
fr: Ne pas manger\, ne pas boire et ne pas fumer pendant l'utilisation, S20/21
hu: A használat közben enni\, inni és dohányozni nem szabad, S20/21
it: Non mangiare\, nè bere\, nè fumare durante l'impiego, S20/21
lt: Naudojant nevalgyti\, negerti ir nerūkyti, S20/21
lv: Nedzert\, neēst un nesmēkēt¸ darbojoties ar vielu, S20/21
mt: Meta tużah tikolx\, tixrobx u tpejjipx, S20/21
nl: Niet eten\, drinken of roken tijdens gebruik, S20/21
no: Det må ikke spises\, drikkes eller røykes under arbeidet, S20/21
pl: Nie jeść i nie pić oraz nie palić tytoniu podczas stosowania produktu, S20/21
pt: Não comer\, beber ou fumar durante a utilização, S20/21
sk: Pri používaní nejedzte\, nepite ani nefajčite, S20/21
sl: Med uporabo ne jesti\, ne piti in ne kaditi, S20/21
sv: Ät inte\, drick inte eller rök inte under hanteringen, S20/21

en: When using do not smoke, S21
cs: Nekuřte při používání, S21
de: Bei der Arbeit nicht rauchen, S21
dk: Der må ikke ryges under brugen, S21
el: Μη καπνίζετε όταν το χρησιµοποιείτε, S21
es: No fumar durante su utilización, S21
et: Käitlemisel suitsetamine keelatud, S21
fi: Tupakointi kielletty kemikaalia käytettäessä, S21
fr: Ne pas fumer pendant l'utilisation, S21
hu: Használat közben tilos a dohányzás, S21
it: Non fumare durante l'impiego, S21
lt: Naudojant nerūkyti, S21
lv: Nesmēkēt¸ darbojoties ar vielu, S21
mt: Tpejjipx waqt li qed tużah, S21
nl: Niet roken tijdens gebruik, S21
no: Det må ikke røykes under arbeidet, S21
pl: Nie palić tytoniu podczas stosowania produktu, S21
pt: Não fumar durante a utilização, S21
sk: Pri používaní nefajčite, S21
sl: Med uporabo ne kaditi, S21
sv: Rök inte under hanteringen, S21

en: Do not breathe dust, S22
cs: Nevdechujte prach, S22
de: Staub nicht einatmen, S22
dk: Undgå indånding af støv, S22
el: Μη αναπνέετε την σκόνη, S22
es: No respirar el polvo, S22
et: Vältida tolmu sissehingamist, S22
fi: Vältettävä pölyn hengittämistä, S22
fr: Ne pas respirer les poussières, S22
hu: Az anyag porát nem szabad belélegezni, S22
it: Non respirare le polveri, S22
lt: Neįkvėpti dulkių, S22
lv: Izvairīties no putekļu ieelpošanas, S22
mt: Tiġbidx it-trab 'il ġewwa b'imnifsejk, S22
nl: Stof niet inademen, S22
no: Unngå innånding av støv, S22
pl: Nie wdychać pyłu, S22
pt: Não respirar as poeiras, S22
sk: Nevdychujte prach, S22
sl: Ne vdihavati prahu, S22
sv: Undvik inandning av damm, S22

en: Do not breathe gas/fumes/vapour/spray (appropriate wording to be specified by the manufacturer), S23
cs: Nevdechujte plyny/dýmy/páry/ aerosoly (příslušný vý raz specifikuje vý robce), S23
de: Gas/Rauch/Dampf/Aerosol nicht einatmen (geeignete Bezeichnung(en) vom Hersteller anzugeben), S23
dk: Undgå indånding af gas/røg/dampe/aerosol-tåger (den eller de pågældende betegnelser angives af fabrikanten), S23
el: Μην αναπνέετε αέρια/αναθυµιάσεις/ατµούς/εκνεφώµατα (η κατάλ- ληλη διατύπωση καθορίζεται από τον παραγωγό), S23
es: No respirar los gases/humos/vapores/aerosoles [denominación(es) adecuada(s) a especificar por el fabricante), S23
et: Vältida gaasi/suitsu/auru/udu (sobiva mõiste määrab valmistaja) sissehingamist, S23
fi: Vältettävä kaasun/huurun/höyryn/sumun hengittämistä (oikean sanamuodon valitsee valmistaja/maahantuoja), S23
fr: Ne pas respirer les gaz/fumées/vapeurs/aérosols [terme(s) approprié(s) à indiquer par le fabricant], S23
hu: A keletkező gázt/füstöt/gőzt/permetet nem szabad belélegezni (a megfelelő szöveget a gyártó határozza meg), S23
it: Non respirare i gas/fumi/vapori/aerosoli (termine(i) appropriato(i) da precisare da parte del produttore), S23
lt: Neįkvėpti dujų\, dūmų\, garų\, aerozolių (konkrečiai nurodo gamintojas), S23
lv: Izvairīties no gāzes vai dūmu\, vai tvaiku\, vai aerosolu ieelpošanas (formulējumu nosaka ražotājs), S23
mt: Tiġbidx gass/dħaħen/fwar/sprej 'il ġewwa b'imnifsejk (itterminu jew termini adatti jridu jkunu speċifikati mill-manifattur), S23
nl: Gas/rook/damp/spuitnevel niet inademen (toepasselijke term(en) aan te geven door de fabrikant), S23
no: Unngå innånding av gass/røyk/damp/sprøytetåke, S23
pl: Nie wdychać gazu/ dymu/pary/rozpylonej cieczy (rodzaj określi producent), S23
pt: Não respirar os gases/vapores/fumos/aerossóis (termo(s) apropriado(s) a indicar pelo produtor), S23
sk: Nevdychujte plyn/dym/pary/aerosóly (Vhodné slovo špecifikuje výrobca), S23
sl: Ne vdihavati plina/dima/hlapov/meglice (ustrezno besedilo določi proizvajalec), S23
sv: Undvik inandning av gas/rök/ånga/dimma (lämplig formulering anges av tillverkaren), S23

en: Do not breathe vapour/aerosol, S23.1
de: Dampf/Aerosol nicht einatmen, S23.1
dk: Undgå indånding af damp/aerosol, S23.1
es: No aspirar vapores/ aerosoles, S23.1
fi: Höyryä/erosolia ei saa hengittää, S23.1
fr: Ne pas inhaler vapeur/aérosol, S23.1
it: Non respirare il vapore o l'aerosol, S23.1
nl: Adem de damp/aërosol niet in, S23.1
no: Damp/aerosol skal ikke innåndes, S23.1
pt: Não inalar o vapor/aerossol, S23.1
sv: Undvik inandning av ånga/aerosol, S23.1

en: Do not breathe gas/vapour, S23.2
de: Gas/Dampf nicht einatmen, S23.2
dk: Undgå indånding af gas/damp, S23.2
es: No inhalar gas/ vapor, S23.2
fi: Ei saa hengittää kaasua/höyryä, S23.2
fr: Ne pas inhaler gaz/vapeur, S23.2
it: Non respirare il gas o il vapore, S23.2
nl: Adem het gas/de damp niet in, S23.2
no: Gass/damp må ikke innåndes, S23.2
pt: Não inalar o gás/vapor, S23.2
sv: Undvik inandning av gas/ånga, S23.2

en: Do not breathe gas/vapour/aerosol, S23.3
de: Gas/Dampf/Aerosol nicht einatmen, S23.3
dk: Undgå indånding af gas/damp/aerosol, S23.3
es: No inhalar gas/ vapor/ aerosol, S23.3
fi: Ei saa hengittää kaasua/höyryä/aerosolia, S23.3
fr: Ne pas inhaler gaz/vapeur/aérosol, S23.3
it: Non respirare il gas\, il vapore o l'aerosol, S23.3
nl: Adem het gas/de damp/het aërosol niet in, S23.3
no: Gass/damp/aerosol må ikke innåndes, S23.3
pt: Não inalar o gás/vapor/aerossol, S23.3
sv: Undvik inandning av gas/ånga/aerosol, S23.3